Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-402
Privilege of leaving jail; petition; order of sentencing court; withdrawal of privilege.

The privilege of leaving the jail as set forth in section 47-401 shall be granted only by written order of the sentencing court, after conferring with the chief of police, county sheriff, or such other person as may be charged with the administrative direction of the jail, specifically setting forth the terms and conditions of the privilege granted. The prisoner may petition the court for such privilege at the time of sentencing, or thereafter, and, in the discretion of the court, may renew his or her petition. The court may withdraw the privilege at any time by written order entered with or without prior notice.

Laws 1969, c. 208, § 2, p. 813;

Laws 1984, LB 394, § 23.

Denial of work release should not be subject to review except where there has been a clear abuse of the court's broad discretion. State v. Temple, 195 Neb. 91, 236 N.W.2d 835 (1975).